Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.040

Community realty subject to liens, execution.

Community real estate shall be subject to the liens of mechanics and others for labor and materials furnished in erecting structures and improvements thereon as provided by law in other cases, to liens of judgments recovered for community debts, and to sale on execution issued thereon.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 108 s 4; Code 1881 s 2410; RRS s 6893.]

NOTES:

Acknowledgments: Chapter 64.08 RCW.

Liens: Title 60 RCW.